hu: Csizma támasztási szintje: Extra magas; Magas; Enyhe; Közepes; Egyéb
ja: ブートサポートレベル: 特高; 高; 軽; 中; その他
ko: 부트 지지 수준: 매유 높음; 높음; 가벼움; 중간; 기타
da: Støvlens støtteniveau: Ekstra høj; Høj; Let; Moderat; Andet
pt-PT: Nível de suporte da bota: Extra alto; Alto; Ligeiro; Moderado; Outro
bg-BG: Ниво на поддръжка на обувката: Много високо; Високо; Леко; Умерено; Друго
it: Livello di assistenza Boot: Molto alto; Alto; Leggero; Moderato; Altro
nl: Schoen niveau steun: Extra hoog; Hoog; Licht; Matig; Overige
pl: Poziom wsparcia buta: Bardzo wysoki; Wysoki; Lekki; Umiarkowany; Inne
fr: Niveau de maintien de la botte: Très élevé; Élevé; Léger; Modéré; Autre
cs: Úroveň podpory boty: Velmi vysoká; Vysoká; Lehká; Střední; Jiné
pt-BR: Nível de suporte da bota: Muito alto; Alto; Leve; Moderado; Outros
nb: Støttenivå for støvel: Ekstra høy; Høy; Lett; Moderat; Annet
sv: Nivå av stöd: Extra hög; Hög; Lätt; Måttlig; Annan
sl-SI: Raven podpore za čevelj: Zelo visoka; Visoka; Lahka; Zmerna; Drugo
zh-TW: 雪靴支撐等級: 極高; 高; 輕度; 中度; 其他
es: Nivel de soporte de la bota: Extraalto; Alto; Ligero; Moderado; Otro
ro-RO: Nivel de asistență pentru încălțăminte: Foarte ridicat; Ridicat; Ușor; Moderat; Altele
de: Unterstützungsgrad des Boots: Extra hoch; Hoch; Leicht; Mittel; Sonstige
th: ระดับการรองรับของรองเท้าบู๊ต: สูงมาก; สูง; เบา; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Razina podrške za čizmu: Iznimno visoka; Visoka; Lagana; Umjerena; Ostalo
fi: Käynnistystuen taso: Erittäin korkea; Korkea; Kevyt; Kohtalainen; Muu
en: Boot support level: Extra high; High; Light; Moderate; Other
el: Επίπεδο υποστήριξης μπότας: Πολύ υψηλό; Υψηλό; Ελαφρύ; Μέτριο; Άλλο
ru: Уровень поддержки ботинка: Сверхвысокая; Высокая; Лёгкая; Средняя; Другое
lt-LT: Batų atramos lygis: Labai aukštas; Aukštas; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Kitas
sk-SK: Úroveň podpory obuvi: Extra vysoká; Vysoká; Ľahká; Stredná; Iné
vi: Mức độ hỗ trợ giày: Cực cao; Cao; Nhẹ; Vừa phải; Khác
tr: Bot destek seviyesi: Ekstra yüksek; Yüksek; Hafif; Orta; Diğer
zh-CN: 启动支持级别: 极高; 高; 轻度; 中度; 其他